Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 65. Actions, Immunities, Defenses, and Duties.
Sec. 09.65.202.
Tort immunity for landowners’ allowing recreational activity; adverse possession.

A landowner that allows a recreational activity on the landowner’s land without charge does not, by allowing that activity,

owe a duty of care to maintain the land safe for entry or use for a recreational activity or to eliminate, alter, or control the inherent risks of a recreational activity;

owe a duty to warn persons using the land for a recreational activity of any dangerous condition, known or unknown, apparent or hidden;

owe a duty to curtail or prevent use of the land for recreational activities;

implicitly ensure that the land is safe for any purpose;

confer a legal status, such as invitee or licensee, to which a special duty of care is owed; or

assume responsibility for any injury to persons or property.

This section applies only during the time that a landowner allows recreational use under a recorded grant of a public recreational use easement as required in AS

34.17.100

.

This section does not apply to a civil action

if the landowner collects a charge for entry on the land for a recreational activity; or

that is based on intentional, reckless, or grossly negligent conduct of the landowner.

This section may not be construed to conflict with, nor does it have any effect on, a liability release agreement between a participant in a recreational activity and a landowner.

Except as provided for under AS

09.45.052(d)

, land use allowed by a landowner for a recreational activity without charge may not form the basis of a claim for adverse possession, prescriptive easement, or a similar claim.

In this section,

“charge” means a fee or admission price imposed for access to or use of land, a recreational activity, a service, an entertainment, or another activity, except that the following is not considered a “charge”:

consideration received by the landowner from the state or political subdivision for land leased or dedicated to the state or political subdivision;

property tax relief in exchange for a landowner’s agreement to open land for a recreational activity; or

a contribution in kind, service, or cash from a user if all of the contribution is used to improve access or trails, to remedy or reduce damage, to provide warning of a hazard, or to remove a hazard from the land;

“land” includes private

unimproved land;

improved land, exclusive of buildings, structures, machinery, or equipment on the land;

ways or land subject to an easement or right-of-way;

roads and trails;

water and watercourses on or running through the land;

“landowner” means a private person who owns land;

“private person” has the meaning given in AS

09.55.240

;

“recreational activity” has the meaning given “sports or recreational activity” in AS

09.65.290

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 2008)

Sec. 09.65.205.
Civil liability for controlled substances offense.

A person who sells or barters a controlled substance in violation of AS 11.71 is strictly liable

to the recipient or another person for civil damages if, while under the influence of the controlled substance, the person receiving the controlled substance engages in conduct that results in civil damages and the recipient’s being under the influence of the controlled substance substantially contributes to the civil damages; and

for the cost to the state or political subdivision to criminally prosecute a person who receives a controlled substance from a person who violates AS 11.71 if the prosecution results from the violation of AS 11.71 described in this subsection.

In an action under (a) of this section, it is not a defense that the person receiving the controlled substance voluntarily consumed the controlled substance or was voluntarily under the influence of the controlled substance.

In this section,

“civil damages” includes damages for personal injury, death, or injury to property of a person, including the state or a political subdivision of the state;

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 18 SLA 1997)

Sec. 09.65.210.
Damages resulting from commission of a felony or while under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

A person who suffers personal injury or death or the person’s personal representative under AS

09.55.570

or

09.55.580

may not recover damages for the personal injury or death if the injury or death occurred while the person was

engaged in the commission of a felony, the person has been convicted of the felony, including conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere, and the party defending against the claim proves by clear and convincing evidence that the felony substantially contributed to the personal injury or death;

engaged in conduct that would constitute the commission of an unclassified felony, a class A felony, or a class B felony for which the person was not convicted and the party defending against the claim proves by clear and convincing evidence

the felonious conduct; and

that the felonious conduct substantially contributed to the personal injury or death;

fleeing after the commission, by that person, of conduct that would constitute an unclassified felony, a class A felony, or a class B felony or being apprehended for conduct that would constitute an unclassified felony, a class A felony, or a class B felony if the party defending against the claim proves by clear and convincing evidence

the felonious conduct; and

that the conduct during the flight or apprehension substantially contributed to the injury or death;

operating a vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any controlled substance in violation of AS

28.35.030

, was convicted, including conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere, and the party defending against the claim proves by clear and convincing evidence that the conduct substantially contributed to the personal injury or death; or

engaged in conduct that would constitute a violation of AS

28.35.030

for which the person was not convicted if the party defending against the claim proves by clear and convincing evidence

the violation of AS

28.35.030

; and

that the conduct substantially contributed to the personal injury or death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1986; am § 31 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.17.030

. Renumbered in 1994.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 139, SLA 1986 provides that this section applies “to all causes of action accruing after June 11, 1986.”

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.65.215.
Immunity of peace officer for use of body wire eavesdropping device.

A peace officer who intercepts an oral communication by use of an electronic, mechanical, or other eavesdropping device that is concealed on or carried on the person of the peace officer and that transmits that oral communication by means of radio to a receiving unit that is monitored by other peace officers, or who monitors the receiving unit, is not liable for damages to a person whose oral communication is intercepted if

the interception and monitoring occurs

during the investigation of a crime or the arrest of a person for a crime; and

for the purpose of ensuring the safety of the peace officer conducting the investigation or making the arrest;

the peace officer who intercepts the oral communication is a party to the communication and has consented to the interception; and

the communication intercepted is not recorded.

In this section,

“intercept” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“oral communication” has the meaning given in AS

42.20.390

;

“peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent related to the 1999 enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 64, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 09.65.220.
Immunity for certain real property disclosures.

The owner of an interest in real property, the owner’s agent, and the agent of the transferee of the interest are not liable to the transferee for the owner or agent’s failure to disclose information on the real property to the transferee, if the disclosure would constitute discrimination prohibited by 42 U.S.C. 3601 — 3631 (Fair Housing Act). In this section, “transferee” includes a purchaser, lessee, and easement holder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.45.797

. Renumbered in 1994.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 16, SLA 1991 provides that this section “does not apply to a failure to disclose information on real property unless the failure to disclose occurs on or after September 3, 1991.”

Sec. 09.65.230.
Innocent misrepresentations by agents in real property transfers.

The agent of a transferor or transferee is not liable for an innocent misrepresentation in information provided to the transferor or transferee in the transfer of an interest in real property if the agent does not have personal knowledge of the error, inaccuracy, or omission that is the basis for the misrepresentation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

09.65.170

. Renumbered in 1994.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 110, SLA 1994 provides that this section “applies to causes of action that accrue on or after September 8, 1994.”

Sec. 09.65.235.
Immunity for negotiated regulation making committee and its members.

A civil action for damages or costs may not be brought against a negotiated regulation making committee established under AS

44.62.710

—

44.62.800

or any of its members for an act or omission occurring in the course and scope of the official duties of the committee under AS

44.62.710

—

44.62.800

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 117 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 117, SLA 1998, which was to repeal this section effective July 1, 2003, was repealed by § 2, ch. 44, SLA 2003.

Sec. 09.65.240.
Liability of the state and regional educational attendance areas for release of hazardous substances.

Notwithstanding AS

46.03.822

(a), neither the state nor a regional educational attendance area established under AS 14.08, nor an agent or employee of the state or a regional educational attendance area acting within the scope of that agency or employment, is subject to liability under AS

46.03.822

for damages, as defined in AS

46.03.822(n)

and

46.03.824

, for the release of a hazardous substance at or from any facility used in relation to a regional educational attendance area school as described in AS

14.08.151

or at or from any facility used in relation to a school operated by the state under AS 14.16.

In this section,

“facility” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

;

“hazardous substance” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, in subsection (a), “AS

46.03.822(n)

” was substituted for “AS

46.03.822(m)

” to reflect the relettering of that subsection; previously in 2006, “AS

46.03.822(m)

” had been substituted for “AS

46.03.822(k)

” to reflect the relettering of that subsection.

Editor's notes. —

Section 16, ch. 71, SLA 1997 provides as follows: “(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, the provisions of AS

09.65.240

, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, apply to claims for damages caused by a release of a hazardous substance that are filed on or after the effective date of sec. 1 of this Act.

“(b) The provisions of AS

09.65.240

, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, do not apply to a claim by a person damaged by a release of a hazardous substance that occurs before the effective date of sec. 1 of this Act if the claim is filed not more than one year after the person knew or should have known that the person was damaged by the release of a hazardous substance.”

Sec. 09.65.245.
Immunity for certain persons supplying or using gravel or other aggregate material; limitations on asbestos-related actions against defendants.

Notwithstanding AS

09.50.250

, a civil action or claim for damages or costs alleging a death, injury, illness, disability, property damage, or any other damages resulting from the use of gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos may not be brought against a defendant, including a contractor meeting the requirements of the program or the state and its agencies, officers, and employees,

based on the ownership of land within an area designated by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c) from which gravel or other aggregate material is extracted that, when tested using a bulk method prescribed by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities by regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent naturally occurring asbestos by mass; or

for an act or omission occurring in the course of extracting, supplying, transporting, or using gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos within an area designated by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c) when the act or omission was in compliance with the requirements of AS

18.31.250

or AS

44.42.410(b)

, as applicable, and AS

44.42.410(a)

and (e) and applicable regulations developed under AS

44.42.420

.

A civil action or claim based on noncompliance with the requirements of AS

18.31.250

or AS

44.42.410(b)

, as applicable, and AS

44.42.410(a)

and (e) and applicable regulations developed under AS

44.42.420

for damages or costs alleging an asbestos-related death, injury, illness, or disability or alleging asbestos-related property damage or any other asbestos-related damages may only be brought against a defendant that has direct control over or responsibility for compliance with the requirements of AS

18.31.250

or AS

44.42.410(b)

, as applicable, and AS

44.42.410(a)

and (e) and applicable regulations developed under AS

44.42.420

.

Notwithstanding AS

09.50.250

, a civil action or claim for damages or costs alleging an asbestos-related death, injury, illness, or disability or alleging asbestos-related property damage or any other asbestos-related damages may not be brought against any state agency or officer or employee of the state for an act or omission occurring in the course of designating a project area under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c), approving a site-specific use plan, or developing or approving a monitoring plan or a mitigation plan under AS

44.42.410

.

In this section, “naturally occurring asbestos” has the meaning given in AS

44.42.430

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For interim project authorization authority of the Department of Public Transportation and Facilities, see § 4, ch. 13, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For interim standard for asbestos bulk testing, see § 5, ch. 13, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.65.250.
Immunity for certain actions related to child support.

A person, including the state and its subdivisions, agencies, officers, and employees, may not be held liable for good faith

compliance with a subpoena of this or another state that requests information, including the social security number and employment history of a person, issued by the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law;

collection of child support, including encumbering or surrendering assets in response to a notice of lien or levy for the payment of child support; or

compliance with an income withholding notice or an order to withhold and deliver that is regular on its face and is for child support purposes.

History.

(§ 13 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

09.65.240

. Renumbered in 1997.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 09.65.255.
Liability for acts of minors.

Except as provided under (d) and (e) of this section, a person, municipal corporation, association, village, school district, or religious or charitable organization, incorporated or unincorporated, may recover damages in a civil action in an amount not to exceed $15,000 and court costs from either parent or both parents of an unemancipated minor under the age of 18 years who, as a result of a knowing or intentional act, destroys real or personal property belonging to the person, municipal corporation, association, village, school district, or religious or charitable organization. However, for purposes of this subsection, recovery in damages shall be apportioned by the court between the parents without regard to legal custody but with due consideration for the actual care and custody of the minor provided by the parents.

A state agency or its agents, including a person working in or responsible for the operation of a foster home, as defined in AS

47.32.900

, juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, or treatment institution, is not liable for the acts of unemancipated minors in its charge or custody. A state agency or an agent of a state agency, including a nonprofit corporation that designates shelters for runaways under AS

47.10.392

—

47.10.399

and employees of or volunteers with that corporation, is not liable for the acts of a minor sheltered in a shelter for runaways, as defined in AS

47.10.399

. In this subsection,

“juvenile detention facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“juvenile treatment facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“treatment institution” has the meaning given in AS

47.14.990

.

A parent of an unemancipated minor under the age of 18 years who is a runaway or missing minor is not liable under (a) of this section for the acts of the minor that are committed by the minor after a parent of the minor has made a report to a law enforcement agency, as authorized by AS

47.10.141(a)

, that the minor has run away or is missing. In this subsection, “runaway or missing minor” means a minor who a parent reasonably believes is absent from the minor’s residence for the purpose of evading a parent or who is otherwise missing from the minor’s usual place of abode without the consent of a parent.

If a parent has an insurance policy that would compensate a claimant for civil damages described under (a) of this section, and the policy limits are in excess of $15,000, civil damages may be recovered under (a) of this section in an amount not to exceed the policy limits or $25,000, whichever amount is lower.

Subsection (a) of this section does not authorize the recovery of damages from

a legal guardian; or

the adoptive parents of a hard-to-place child if the adoptive parents are receiving, at the time the property is destroyed, financial assistance from the state as a result of the adoption; in this paragraph, “hard-to-place child” has the meaning given in AS

25.23.240

.

If damages are recovered in a civil action as allowed under (a) of this section, the court shall require the unemancipated minor who caused the damages to provide a written report to the court regarding

financial resources of the minor that are available for purposes of restitution;

restitution the minor has made to the claimants; and

what, if anything, the minor has learned from the civil justice process.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1967; am § 10 ch 33 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 34 SLA 1995; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 94 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

34.50.020

; renumbered in 2006.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 94, SLA 2003, that amend this section, see § 1, ch. 94, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (b), in the introductory language, substituted
“home, as defined in AS

47.32.900

, juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, or treatment institution” for “, receiving, or detention home, or children’s institution” following “operation of a foster”, added “In this subsection,” at the end, and added (b)(1) – (3).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 5, ch. 94, SLA 2003, the 2003 amendments to this section apply to “a civil action that accrues on or after July 1, 2003.”

Section 57(b),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (b) of this section applies to minors subject to
AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22,
ch. 16, SLA 2021, and
AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (b) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parent and Child, §§ 88-94.

67A C.J.S., Parent and Child, §§ 329-335.

Parents’ liability for injury or damage intentionally inflicted by minor child. 54 ALR3d 974.

Sec. 09.65.260.
Claims against persons engaged in business arising out of or in connection with the year 2000 date change. [Repealed, § 3 ch 79 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 09.65.270.
Civil immunity related to the sale or transfer of a firearm.

A person may not bring a civil action for damage or harm caused by an individual for whom a federal firearm certificate was executed if the action arises from the execution of the federal firearm certificate by a public official with the authority under federal law to execute the certificate and the individual causing the damage or harm

is the transferee of the firearm; and

at the time the certificate is executed either

has a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued under AS

18.65.700

; or

meets the qualifications imposed under AS

18.65.705

(1) — (5) for obtaining a concealed handgun permit.

In this section, “federal firearm certificate” means the certificate required on a federal “Form 1 (Firearms),” “Form 4 (Firearms),” or “Form 5 (Firearms).”

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SSSLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

09.65.260

. Renumbered in 1999.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 1, SSSLA 1999, this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after December 24, 1999.”

Sec. 09.65.280.
Civil liability of state for acts or omissions of village public safety officers.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the state and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable in tort, except for an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct, for damages for the injury to or death of a person or property damage resulting from the supervision of, training of, actions of or failure to act of, or use of or failure to use village public safety officers in communicating with or monitoring the activities of persons on probation or parole.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 2001)

Sec. 09.65.290.
Civil liability for sports or recreational activities.

A person who participates in a sports or recreational activity assumes the inherent risks in that sports or recreational activity and is legally responsible for all injuries or death to the person or other persons and for all damage to property that results from the inherent risks in that sports or recreational activity.

This section does not require a provider to eliminate, alter, or control the inherent risks within the particular sports or recreational activity that is provided.

This section does not apply to a civil action based on the

negligence of a provider if the negligence was the proximate cause of the injury, death, or damage; or

design or manufacture of sports or recreational equipment or products or safety equipment used incidental to or required by a sports or recreational activity.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with or render as ineffectual a liability release agreement between a person who participates in a sports or recreational activity and a provider.

In this section,

“farm touring” means briefly visiting a farm to observe or experience aspects of raising, growing, producing, cultivating, harvesting, or processing an agricultural product as a tourist, without receiving pay;

“inherent risks” means those dangers or conditions that are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of a sports or recreational activity;

“provider” means a person or a federal, state, or municipal agency that promotes, offers, or conducts a sports or recreational activity, whether for pay or otherwise;

“sports or recreational activity”

means a commonly understood sporting activity, whether undertaken with or without permission, including baseball, softball, football, soccer, basketball, hockey, bungee jumping, parasailing, bicycling, hiking, swimming, skateboarding, horseback riding and other equine activity, farm touring, dude ranching, mountain climbing, river floating, whitewater rafting, canoeing, kayaking, hunting, fishing, backcountry trips, mushing, backcountry or helicopter-assisted skiing, alpine skiing, Nordic skiing, snowboarding, telemarking, snow sliding, snowmobiling, and off-road and all-terrain vehicle use;

does not include

boxing contests, sparring or wrestling matches, or exhibitions that are subject to the requirements of AS 05.10;

activities involving the use of devices that are subject to the requirements of AS 05.20; or

skiing or sliding activities at a ski area that are subject to the requirements of AS 05.45.

History.

(§ 3 ch 121 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 103 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (e)(1) was enacted as (e)(4); renumbered in 2018 at which time other paragraphs were renumbered to maintain alphabetical consistency.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative findings and intent relating to this section, see § 1, ch. 121, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision that provides that the 2018 changes to this section apply “to acts or omissions occurring on or after January 1, 2019”, see sec. 11, ch. 102, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (e), in (e)(3)(A) [now (e)(4)(A)], inserted “farm touring,” following “equine activity,” and made a stylistic change, added (e)(4) [now (e)(1)].

Collateral references. —

Liability to spectator at baseball game who is hit by ball or injured as result of other hazards of game — failure to provide or maintain sufficient screening, 82 ALR6th 417.

Sec. 09.65.292.
Parental waiver of child’s negligence claim against provider of sports or recreational activity.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a parent may, on behalf of the parent’s child, release or waive the child’s prospective claim for negligence against the provider of a sports or recreational activity in which the child participates to the extent that the activities to which the waiver applies are clearly and conspicuously set out in the written waiver and to the extent the waiver is otherwise valid. The release or waiver must be in writing and shall be signed by the child’s parent.

A parent may not release or waive a child’s prospective claim against a provider of a sports or recreational activity for reckless or intentional misconduct.

In this section,

“child” means a minor who is not emancipated;

“parent” means

the child’s natural or adoptive parent;

the child’s guardian or other person appointed by the court to act on behalf of the child;

a representative of the Department of Health and Social Services if the child is in the legal custody of the state;

a person who has a valid power of attorney concerning the child; or

for a child not living with the child’s natural or adoptive parent, the child’s grandparent, aunt, uncle, sister, or brother who has reached the age of majority and with whom the child lives;

“provider” has the meaning given in AS

09.65.290

;

“sports or recreational activity” has the meaning given in AS

09.65.290

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 67 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For findings and legislative intent statement applicable to the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 67, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 67, SLA 2004 provides that this section applies “to acts or omissions that occur on or after September 14, 2004.”

Sec. 09.65.295.
Liability involving a peace officer or firefighter.

A peace officer or firefighter injured while in the line of duty or the personal representative of a peace officer or firefighter who died in the line of duty may not bring a civil action to recover damages for a negligent act or omission if the negligent act or omission created the need for the activity being performed by the peace officer or firefighter.

This section does not apply to a negligent act or omission that is unrelated to the activity that created the need for the presence of the peace officer or firefighter.

In this section, “firefighter” means a person employed by a municipal fire department or who is a member of a volunteer fire department registered with the state fire marshal, or a person registered for purposes of workers’ compensation with the state fire marshal as a member of a volunteer fire department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 146 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

09.65.290

. Renumbered in 2003.

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “firefighter” for “fire fighter” in this section.

Sec. 09.65.300.
Immunity for providing free health care services.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a health care provider who provides health care services to another person is not liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in providing the health care services if the health care

provider is licensed in this state to provide health care services; in this paragraph, “health care provider” includes a health care provider who holds a temporary license or permit to practice as a health care provider;

services provided were within the scope of the health care provider’s license;

services were provided at a medical clinic, medical facility, nonprofit facility, temporary emergency site, or other facility owned or operated by a governmental entity or nonprofit organization and the health care provider was acting within the scope of the provider’s responsibilities in the medical clinic, governmental entity, or nonprofit organization;

services were provided voluntarily and without pay to the health care provider for the services, except as provided in (b)(2) and (3) of this section; and

provider

obtains informed consent in writing from the person receiving the health care services as described under AS

09.55.556

, except in the case of an emergency;

provides the person receiving the health care services advance written notice of the immunity provided under this section to a health care provider when providing voluntary health care services as described under this section; and

provides the person receiving health care services with written notice of the name of a licensed health care provider in the state that the person receiving health care services may contact for emergency follow-up care within 30 days after a procedure is performed.

This section does not preclude

liability for civil damages that are the result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct;

a health care provider from receiving payment or being reimbursed for expenses, including travel and room and board while providing voluntary services;

a medical clinic or facility from charging for its services.

In this section,

“health care provider” means a physician, physician assistant, dentist, dental hygienist, osteopath, optometrist, chiropractor, registered nurse, practical nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, naturopath, physical therapist, occupational therapist, marital and family therapist, psychologist, psychological associate, behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst, licensed clinical social worker, athletic trainer, or certified direct- entry midwife;

“health care services” means services received by an individual in order to treat or to prevent illness or injury;

“nonprofit organization” means an organization that qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or (4) (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 3 ch 56 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 6 SLA 2014; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 41 SLA 2014; am § 24 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent concerning this section, see § 2, ch. 56, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective April 9, 2014, in (a)(1), added the second clause, in (a)(5)(A), inserted “in writing” following “obtains informed consent”, added (a)(5)(C), and made related changes; in (c)(1), substituted “means a physician” for “means a state licensed physician” near the beginning.

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (c)(1), inserted “athletic trainer,” following “licensed clinical social worker,” near the end.

The third 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (c)(1), inserted “behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst,” following “psychological associate,”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” following “advanced”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 4, ch. 56, SLA 2004, this section applies “to a cause of action that accrues on or after June 15, 2004.”

Sec. 09.65.305.
Immunity for distributing free recycled used eyeglasses.

A nonprofit organization approved by the department is not liable for distributing recycled used eyeglasses if

the eyeglasses are distributed and fitted free of charge and the fitting conforms, to the extent possible, with a written prescription from a licensed physician or optometrist; and

the organization obtains informed consent from the person receiving the eyeglasses and provides the person receiving the eyeglasses advance written notice of the immunity provided under this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 19 SLA 2008)

Sec. 09.65.310.
Damages resulting from driving the vehicle of a person under the influence of an alcoholic beverage. [Repealed, § 3 ch 69 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 09.65.315.
Damages resulting from driving the vehicle of a person under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

A person is not liable beyond the limits of any applicable insurance policy purchased by or on behalf of the owner of the vehicle, or the taxicab or limousine company or the company’s owner, agents, or employees, for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident if the person was driving a vehicle involved in the accident and

before the accident, started driving the vehicle involved in the accident from or near licensed premises;

is, at the time of the accident, a person employed in the course and scope of employment to or under contract to drive a taxicab or limousine, a taxicab or limousine owner, a holder of a taxicab or limousine permit issued by a municipality, or an owner or employee of a company that dispatches taxicabs or limousines;

was not under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance at the time of the accident;

was driving the vehicle to the motor vehicle owner’s residence or designated residential location at the request of the motor vehicle owner or operator or a law enforcement officer; and

was driving the vehicle because the motor vehicle owner or operator was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or reasonably believed to be under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.

A person licensed under AS

04.11.080

—

04.11.255

, or an agent or employee of the person, is not liable for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident described under (a) of this section. A person or entity that participates in making arrangements for transportation of a vehicle under (a) of this section is not liable for damages resulting from a motor vehicle accident described in (a) of this section.

This section does not

preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct;

limit the ability of a person to recover damages under any applicable uninsured or underinsured motor vehicle insurance coverage; or

limit the ability of a person to recover damages under any applicable liability insurance coverage purchased by or on behalf of the person being transported under (a) of this section.

A motor vehicle owner is considered to have given consent to another person to drive the owner’s motor vehicle if the other person is involved in an accident and the provisions of (a) of this section apply to the other person.

In this section,

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

28.33.190

;

“inhalant” has the meaning given to the phrase “hazardous volatile material or substance” in AS

47.37.270

;

“licensed premises” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

For the applicability provision relating to this section, see § 3, ch. 15, SLA 2011.